Connecticut, session 2026, SB00213.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to require the imposition of a
surcharge of twenty-five cents on the monthly fee paid by residents of
the state for telecommunication services and cellular mobile telephone
services provided in the state that are capable of accessing the 9-8-8
Suicide Prevention and Mental Health Crisis Lifeline for (1) deposit into
the 9-8-8 Suicide Prevention and Mental Health Crisis Lifeline Fund
established pursuant to section 17a-674a of the general statutes, and (2)
administration of the 2-1-1 Infoline program in the state operated by the
United Way of Connecticut.